Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.200

Bachelor degrees authorized.

The degree of bachelor of arts or the degree of bachelor of science and/or the degree of bachelor of arts in education may be granted to any student who has completed a four-year course of study or the equivalent thereof in Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University, or Western Washington University.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 50. Prior: 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.200; prior: 1967 c 231 s 1; 1967 c 47 s 7; 1947 c 109 s 1; 1933 c 13 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4618-1. Formerly RCW 28B.40.200, part; 28.81.052; 28.81.050(16).]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.